Mississippi, session 2026, HB1322.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  (a)  The State Department of Health shall appoint a Research 1 (R1) Mississippi university to conduct a study on the prevention and reduction of amputations resulting from diabetes and related complications.  An R1 university is a Carnegie-designated high research university. (b)  The study shall evaluate: (i)  The prevalence of diabetes-related amputations in this state; (ii)  The cost to the state of treatment and care associated with those amputations; (iii)  Evidence-based best practices for the prevention of diabetes-related amputations, including early detection and screening programs; (iv)  Strategies to expand access to limb-saving services, including multidisciplinary care teams, wound care, podiatry, and patient education; and (v)  Opportunities for public-private partnerships to reduce the rate of amputations. (2)  The study committee shall be governed by the R1 university and consist of: (a)  The executive director of the State Department of Health or his designee; (b)  A physician licensed in this state who specializes in endocrinology; (c)  A nurse licensed in this state with expertise in diabetes education; (d)  A vascular surgeon with expertise in amputation prevention; (e)  A physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse in amputation prevention; (f)  A podiatrist with expertise in treating diabetic foot ulcers; (g)  A podiatrist or vascular surgeon affiliated with the United States Department of Veterans Affairs; (h)  A representative of a public health provider; (i)  At least one (1) person diagnosed with diabetes or who has experienced diabetes-related amputation; (j)  A representative of the American Diabetes Association; and (k)  Other individuals named by the R1 university. (3)  Not later than December 1, 2026, the study committee shall submit a report on the results of the study and recommendations to the Chairs of the House Public Health and Human Services Committee and Senate Public Health and Welfare Committee chairs and their committee members. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.